Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-145] Drunken or reckless driving.
Any person subject to this chapter who operates any vehicle while drunk, or in
a reckless or wanton manner, shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.
[L 1982, c 171, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next